District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.16

Repealed

Subsidiaries.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 17, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(f), 45 DCR 5187
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1102(f), 46 DCR 6373
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.16.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1102(f) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).